Alabama, session 2026rs, HB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
In Tuscaloosa County, full-time mayors of
municipalities in the county may participate in the Employees'
Retirement System of Alabama under the same terms and
conditions as other employees in the same retirement system.
Any mayor holding office at the time of the ratification of
this amendment shall be eligible to purchase service credit in
the Employees' Retirement System for the time the official has
served in the current office. No individual may participate in
both a supernumerary program and the Employees' Retirement
System based on the same service.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
Page 1

for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
HB92 Enrolled
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Tuscaloosa County, proposing an amendment
to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to authorize the
full-time mayors of municipalities in the county to
participate in the Employees' Retirement System of Alabama
under the same terms and conditions as other employees in the
same retirement system.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB92 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3